Washington statutes.
RCW 2.68.020

Judicial information system account.

There is created an account in the custody of the state treasurer to be known as the judicial information system account. The administrative office of the courts shall maintain and administer the account, in which shall be deposited all moneys received from in-state noncourt users and any out-of-state users of the judicial information system and moneys as specified in RCW 2.68.040 for the purposes of providing judicial information system access to noncourt users and providing an adequate level of automated services to the judiciary. The legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account for the purposes of the judicial information system. The account shall be used for the acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, services, and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation, and administration of information services, telecommunications, systems, software, supplies, and equipment, including the payment of principal and interest on items paid in installments. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the judicial information system account may be appropriated to support the state law library. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the judicial information system account may be appropriated to support the information systems and other activities in the administrative office of the courts.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 950; 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 913. Prior: 2009 c 564 s 1802; 2009 c 564 s 918; 2005 c 282 s 11; 1994 c 8 s 1; 1989 c 364 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 30, 2013]; except for section 952 of this act which takes effect August 1, 2013, section 968 of this act which takes effect June 30, 2013; sections 978 and 996 of this act which take effect July 28, 2013; and sections 991 and 992 of this act which take effect July 1, 2013." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1904.]

Effective date—2012 2nd sp.s. c 7: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 2, 2012]." [ 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 938.]

Effective date—2009 c 564: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 19, 2009]." [ 2009 c 564 s 1812.]